District of Columbia statutes.
47-2423

Seizure and forfeiture of gray market cigarettes.

Cigarettes that are acquired, held, owned, possessed, transported in, imported into, or sold or distributed in the District in violation of § 47-2419 shall be deemed contraband and shall be subject to seizure, forfeiture, and destruction by the Mayor under § 47-2409. The cigarettes shall be deemed contraband whether the violation of this chapter is knowing or otherwise.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-225, § 2(c), 48 DCR 35
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 16(c)(4), 48 DCR 1873
D.C. Law 13-313 inserted the section symbol in the section heading.